Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB179.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 11(e) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, is amended to read:Section 11. Remedies and Penalties.--* * *(e) (1) In the event that the secretary shall determine, after notice and hearing as required by this section, that any person or firm has failed to pay the prevailing wages and that [such] the failure was intentional, [he] the secretary shall [thereupon] notify all public bodies of the name [or names] of [such persons or firms] the person or firm and no contract shall be awarded to [such persons or firms] the person or firm or to any firm, corporation or partnership in which [such persons or 12345678910111213141516171819 firms have] the person or firm has an interest until [three years have elapsed] the following duration of debarment has been satisfied from the date of the notice to the public bodies [aforesaid.]:(i) Three years, when the amount that the person or firm failed to pay is less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).(ii) Five years, when the amount that the person or firm failed to pay is greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000) but less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(iii) Ten years, when the amount that the person or firm failed to pay is greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(2) The secretary [may] shall, in addition [thereto] to paragraph (1), request the Attorney General to proceed to recover the penalties for the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania which are payable under subsection (f) of this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0179PN0118 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617